Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 4
NOISE MITIGATION

43-2-401. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Applicant" means a homeowner or renter residing in an eligible area, or the operator of a temporary housing facility or public housing facility located in an eligible area, who submits an application to the transportation commission in accordance with this part 4.

"Department" means the department of transportation.

"Eligible area" means a residential area that:

Is located adjacent to a state highway;

Existed as a residential area before the state highway was constructed or widened; and

Is located within the boundaries of a local government that, as of the date of the application, has adopted an ordinance or resolution to mitigate the effects of noise in future residential or other noise-sensitive development adjacent to the state highways within the boundaries of the local government.

"Local government" means a city, town, county, or city and county.

"Noise mitigation measures" means noise mitigation measures approved by the transportation commission pursuant to section 43-2-404.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1255, § 3, effective May 26.

43-2-402. Noise mitigation measures.

An applicant may submit an application for noise mitigation measures to the department between November 1 and March 31 in accordance with the application procedures established by the transportation commission by rule.

An application for noise mitigation measures shall:

Be accompanied by a petition in support of the noise mitigation measures signed by members of no less than seventy-five percent of the households in an eligible area who live no more than four-tenths of one mile from the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the state highway;

Specify whether a local government has agreed to provide any of the moneys necessary to construct the noise mitigation measures; and

Specify which noise mitigation measures the applicant proposes for the eligible area.

If local governments in an eligible area have not agreed to provide at least fifty percent of the moneys necessary to construct the proposed noise mitigation measures in the eligible area, an applicant may submit an application for noise mitigation measures under this section only if the eligible area existed as a residential area before the state highway was constructed or widened.

The department shall consider applications received between November 1 and March 31 for noise mitigation measures to be constructed in the state fiscal year commencing the following July 1.

No later than July 1 of each year, the department shall review applications received between November 1 and March 31 of the previous state fiscal year and place applications that meet the requirements of this section on a list of approved noise mitigation measures. The department shall prioritize the measures on the list using a formula that gives equal weight to the following factors:

The hourly equivalent noise level at the first receivers in the eligible area;

The number of homes in the area that will benefit significantly from noise mitigation measures; and

The length of time that the area has been an eligible area.

The department shall construct noise mitigation measures on the list of approved measures for which a local government has agreed to provide no less than fifty percent of the necessary moneys in the order of priority established pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, using moneys provided by local governments and any moneys distributed to the department by the department of public health and environment pursuant to part 14 of article 20 of title 30, C.R.S.

After the construction of noise mitigation measures in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), the department shall use any moneys provided by local governments or distributed to the department pursuant to part 14 of article 20 of title 30, C.R.S., to construct other noise mitigation measures on the list of approved measures in the order of priority established pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

If a noise mitigation measure on the list of approved measures is not constructed in a state fiscal year, the applicant may submit an application for the noise mitigation measure for the next state fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1256, § 3, effective May 26.

L. 2010:

(5) amended, (HB 10-1018), ch. 421, p. 2181, § 15, effective June 10.

L. 2014:

(5)(a) and (5)(b) amended, (HB 14-1352), ch. 351, p. 1596, § 12, effective July 1.

43-2-403. Noise mitigation - privately funded - rules.

An applicant may submit an application for noise mitigation measures to be privately funded to the department at any time in accordance with the application procedures established by the transportation commission by rule.

An application for privately funded noise mitigation measures shall:

Be accompanied by a petition signed by no less than seventy-five percent of the resident homeowners in an eligible area whose homes are located no more than four-tenths of one mile from the nearest edge of the right-of-way of the state highway;

Specify the source of the moneys necessary to construct the noise mitigation measures; and

Specify which noise mitigation measures the applicant proposes for the eligible area.

The department shall consider an application for noise mitigation measures made pursuant to this section within three months after the application is received.

The department shall approve an application for noise mitigation measures that meets the requirements of this section. The applicant may construct noise mitigation measures approved by the department.

Noise mitigation measures constructed in accordance with this section shall:

Comply with applicable rules and procedural directives of the department and the transportation commission;

Meet the noise reduction standards established by the department;

Be compatible with any existing noise mitigation measures in the eligible area; and

Comply with the zoning and building requirements established by a local government in the eligible area.

Noise mitigation measures approved pursuant to this section may be constructed in the state highway right-of-way with the approval of the department or on private land. The department may sell at fair-market value or grant an easement to any land in the state highway right-of-way for the purpose of constructing noise mitigation measures approved in accordance with this section, subject to the provisions of section 43-1-210 (5).

The applicant shall be responsible for the maintenance of the noise mitigation measures constructed in accordance with this section.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1257, § 3, effective May 26.

43-2-404. Rule-making authority.

The transportation commission created by part 1 of article 1 of this title shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., to implement the provisions of this part 4. The rules shall include noise mitigation standards and a list of approved noise mitigation measures and products that meet the standards.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire part added, p. 1258, § 3, effective May 26.